Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Chapter 20 Adult Protective Services
§ 35-20-116.
Access to central registry records pertaining to adult protection cases; child and vulnerable adult abuse and registry account.

Upon appropriate application and for employee or volunteer screening purposes, the department shall provide to any employer or entity whose employees or volunteers may have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults in the course of their employment or volunteer service a record summary concerning abuse, neglect, exploitation or abandonment of a vulnerable adult involving a named individual or shall confirm that no record exists. The state agency shall provide the results of the records check to the applicant by certified mail if the records check confirms the existence of a report “under investigation” or a “substantiated” finding of abuse or neglect. Otherwise, the state agency shall provide the results of the records check to the applicant in accordance with agency rules and by United States mail. The written results shall confirm that there is a report “under investigation”, a “substantiated” finding of abuse or neglect on the central registry naming the individual or confirm that no record exists. When the individual is identified on the registry as a “substantiated” perpetrator of abuse or neglect, the report to the applicant shall contain information with respect to the date of the finding, specific type of abuse or neglect, a copy of the perpetrator’s voluntary statement and whether an appeal is pending. Any applicant receiving a report under this section identifying an individual as “under investigation” shall be notified by the department as to the final disposition of that investigation and whether an appeal is pending. The applicant, or an agent on behalf of the applicant, shall submit a fee in an amount determined by rule of the department and proof satisfactory to the department that the prospective or current employee or volunteer whose records are being checked consents to the release of the information to the applicant. The applicant shall use the information received only for purposes of screening prospective or current employees and volunteers who may, through their employment or volunteer services, have unsupervised access to vulnerable adults. Applicants, their employees or other agents shall not otherwise divulge or make public any information received under this section. The department shall notify any applicant receiving information under this subsection of any subsequent reclassification of the information pursuant to W.S. 35-20-115(c). The department shall screen all prospective employees in conformity with the procedure provided under this subsection.

There is created a program administration account to be known as the child and vulnerable adult abuse registry account. All fees collected under subsection (a) of this section shall be credited to this account.

Any person may request a central registry screen and summary report on themselves as provided by subsection (a) of this section upon payment of the fee required by subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 86, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2017 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 122, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” in (b).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, rewrote (a); and added (c).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "in an amount determined by rule of" for "of not to exceed ten dollars ($10.00) as established by" in the seventh sentence of (a).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”